apertium-war.war.lexd
# Morphological Transducer for Waray

# Part of speech categories
# <n>      # Noun
# <prn>    # Pronoun
# <np>     # Proper noun
# <v>      # Verb
# <adv>    # Adverb
# <pos>    # Possessive
# <tv>     # Transitive verb
# <iv>     # Intransitive verb
# <vaux>   # Auxiliary verb
# <adj>    # Adjective
# <pr>     # Preposition
# <det>    # Determiner
# <obl>    # Oblique
# <nom>    # Nominative 
# <dem>    # Demonstrative
# <def>    # Definite
# <ind>    # Indefinite 
# <link>   # Linker
# <ant>    # Personal Name
# <cnj>    # Conjunction

# <sent>   # Sentence-ending punctuation
# <guio>   # Hyphen
# <cm>     # Comma
# <apos>   # Apostrophe
# <quot>   # Quotation mark
# <lquot>  # Left quotation mark
# <rquot>  # Right quotation mark
# <lpar>   # Left parenthesis
# <rpar>   # Right parenthesis

# Number morphology
# <pl>     # Plural
# <p1>     # First person
# <p2>     # Second person
# <p3>     # Third person
# <sg>     # Singular

# Other symbols
# <past>   # Past tense
# <pres>   # Present tense
# <fut>    # Future tense
# <futd>   # Derivative future
# <imp>    # Imperative
# >        # Morpheme boundary

###############################################################################
###                       M O R P H O T A C T I C S                         ###
###############################################################################

PATTERNS
NounRoot [<n>: ]
Determiners(1) [<det>: ] Determiners(2):
PluralDet
:VerbPrefixes VerbStems(1) [<v>: ] VerbStems(2): VerbPrefixes: 
VerbStems(1) [<v>: ] VerbStems(2): 
Pronouns 
ProperNouns(1) [<np>: ] ProperNouns(2):
Adverbs [<adv>: ]
Auxiliary [<vaux>: ]
Punctuation
Numerals
Num-Lex 
Conjunctions
Adjectives [<adj>: ]

###############################################################################
###                          L E X I C O N                                  ###
###############################################################################

LEXICON NounRoot
abaniko:abaniko		                # hand fan
abugádo:abugádo		                # lawyer
adaw:adaw			                # midday; noon time
adlaw:adlaw                         # day
aga:aga                             # morning
agdbon:agdbon		                # ashes
alibangbang:alibangbang	            # butterfly
alad:alad			                # fence
anák:anák			                # child
ani:ani				                # harvest
apó:apó			                    # grandchilden
apóy:apóy                           # grandmother	
asawa:asawa			                # husband
asúkar:asúkar			            # sugar
áwto:áwto			                # car
áyam:áyam			                # dog
babaye:babaye                       # woman
báboy:báboy			                # pig
bádo:bádo			                # dress, shirt
balay:balay			                # dwelling place, house
baláod:baláod			            # law
balitâ:balitâ			            # news
barangán:barangán		            # witch doctor
báso:báso                           # glass
bata:bata                           # child
baton:baton			                # answer
bayáni:bayáni			            # hero
baybáyon:baybáyon		            # beach
bendísyon:bendísyon		            # blessing
biblíya:biblíya			            # bible
bisita:bisita			            # visitor
biyáhe:biyáhe			            # trip, journey
bodéga:bodéga		                # warehouse, storage
botíka:botíka			            # pharmacy
buhî:buhî			                # living
buho:buho			                # hole
bulád:bulád			                # dried fish
bulig:bulig			                # help
búngto:búngto		                # town
buruhatón:buruhatón 	            # work, activity
butáng:butáng			            # thing
dada:dada			                # aunt
diyákono:diyákono		            # deacon
diyos-diyos:diyos-diyos             # idol
doktrína:doktrína		            # doctrine
dyaket:dyaket                       # jacket
espiritú:espiritú		            # spirit
estudyante:estudyante               # student
gábi:gáb-i                          # night
gábi:gábi                           # night         Dir/LR
gátas:gátas			                # milk
grúpo:grúpo			                # group
gúgma:gúgma			                # love
habubô:habubô                       # problem
hagdanán:hagdanán		            # ladder
hángin:hángin			            # air, wind
hardinéro:hardinéro		            # gardener
harok:harok                         # kiss
húnàhúnà:húnàhúnà		            # mind
hayop:hayop                         # animal
ido:ido				                # dog
iglésiya:iglésiya		            # church
impyérno:impyérno		            # hell
kaádlawan:kaádlawan	                # birthday
kaamyaw:kaamyaw		                # neighborhood
kabulig:kabulig		                # helper
káhoy:káhoy			                # tree, lumber
kamátis:kamátis		                # tomato
kamatuóran:kamatuóran	            # truth
kánta:kánta			                # song
kánto:kánto			                # corner
kapáyas:kapáyas		                # papaya
kape:kape                           # coffee
kapitán:kapitán		                # captain
kapílya:kapílya			            # chapel
karabaw:karabaw		                # carabao
karsáda:karsáda		                # street, road
kárne:kárne			                # meat
karnéng\ báboy:karnéng\ báboy       # pork
kasál:kasál			                # wedding
kasilya:kasilya			            # restroom 
kasíngkásing:kasíngkásing	        # heart
karendériya:karendériya	            # restaurant
kátre:kátre			                # bed
kaugaríngon:kaugaríngon	            # self
kéyk:kéyk			                # cake
kinabúhì:kinabúhì		            # life
kláse:kláse                         # class
klíma:klíma				            # climate
kolehiyo:kolehiyo		            # college
konsehal:konsehal		            # councilman
konsuylo:konsuylo		            # boyfriend, girlfriend
krús:krús			                # cross
kudal:kudal			                # fence
kusína:kusína			            # kitchen
kwarta:kwarta                       # money
kwárto:kwárto			            # room
lagas:lagas			                # old person
leksyon:leksyon                     # lesson 
lalake:lalake                       # man
lalake:lalaki                       # man          Dir/LR
lamésa:lamésa                       # table
lángit:lángit			            # heaven
lápis:lápis                         # pencil
láwas:láwas			                # body
laway:laway                         # saliva
líbro:líbro                         # book
lider:lider			                # leader
lingkúran:lingkúran                 # chair
línya:línya			                # line
litson:litson			            # roasted pig
lugár:lugár			                # place
maís:maís			                # corn
magturútdo:magturútdo	            # teacher
mag-uróma:mag-uróma 	            # farmer
mananap:mananap                     # insect
mángga:mángga                       # mango
mangirísda:mangirísda	            # fisherman
manók:manók			                # chicken
masakiton:masakiton		            # sick person
matá:matá                           # eye
mayor:mayor			                # boss/employer
mensáhe:mensáhe		                # message
merienda:merienda		            # godmother
merkádo:merkádo                     # market
misa:misa			                # mass
muláyan:muláyan		                # toy
nárs:nárs                           # nurse
násud:násud			                # nation
nawóng:nawóng		                # face
negosyante:negosyante	            # businessman
ngáran:ngáran			            # name
ninang:ninang			            # godmother
ninong:ninong			            # godfather
opisína:opisína		                # office
opisyáles:opisyáles                 # officer
ospitál:ospitál                     # hospital
pag-umángkon:pag-umángkon           # nephew
pakiána:pakiána		                # question
panahón:panahón		                # time, season
pánday:pánday		                # carpenter
pangiklop:pangiklop		            # supper
paniudto:paniudto		            # lunch
papél:papél                         # paper
párte:párte			                # party
pasyente:pasyente		            # patient
pátud:pátud			                # cousin
payág:payág			                # hut, shanty
presidénte:presidénte		        # president
probinsya:probinsya		            # province
pulong:pulong			            # word
purtahán:purtahán		            # door
saad:saad			                # promise
sabongán:sabongán		            # cockpit
sakyanán:sakyanán		            # car
salà:salà			                # sin
sangkay:sangkay                     # friend 
sála:sála                           # living room
sánto:sánto			                # saint
sárì-sárì:sárì-sárì		            # small store
saruwál:saruwál		                # pants
sekretarya:sekretarya		        # secretary
serbisyo:serbisyo		            # service
simbahan:simbahan                   # church
siné:siné			                # movie
sinehán:sinehán		                # movie theater
sista:sista			                # guitar
siyudád:siyudád		                # city
sorbeti:sorbeti			            # ice cream
swípstek:swípstek		            # sweepstake
tag-iya:tag-iya			            # owner
táklap:táklap			            # blanket 
támbal:támbal			            # medicine
tanan:tanan			                # everyone, all
tanoman:tanoman		                # garden
tawo:tawo                           # person
telépono:telépono		            # telephone
tindáhan:tindáhan		            # store
tinún-an:tinún-an		            # disciple
tsa:tsa				                # tea
tsinelas:tsinelas		            # slippers
túna:túna			                # land, earth, ground
umá:umá			                    # farm
uniporme:uniporme		            # uniform
urupod:urupod                       # relative
utan:utan                           # cooked vegetable
útang:útang			                # debt
uyáb:uyáb			                # boyfriend, girlfriend
yámà:yámà			                # devil
TV:{-}TV
computer:{-}computer 
bus:{-}bus
piano:{-}piano
guitar:{-}guitar

LEXICON ProperNouns(2)
Diós:Diós                   <ant>             # God
Diós:Diyós                  <ant>             # God             Dir/LR
Ginóo:Ginóo			        <ant>             # Lord
Jésu\ Krísto:Jésu\ Krísto	<ant><m>       	  # Jesus Christ
Satanás:Satanás 		    <ant>             # Satan
Sánta\ Mária:Sánta\ Mária	    <ant><f>          # St. Mary
Rico:Rico                   <ant><m>    
Bobong:Bobong               <ant><m>
Rhoda:Rhoda                 <ant><f>
Romulo:Romulo               <ant><m>
Dodong:Dodong               <ant><m>
Emily:Emily                 <ant><f>
Arnold:Arnold               <ant><m>
John:John                   <ant><m>
Judith:Judith               <ant><f>
